Illinois, session 104th, SB180.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Circuit Courts Act is amended by changing 5Section 2f-14 as follows: 6    (705 ILCS 35/2f-14)7    Sec. 2f-14. 6th judicial circuit; resident judgeships.8    (a) The at-large judgeships of the 6th judicial circuit 9existing on January 7, 2022 shall be converted to resident 10judgeships as provided in this subsection as those judgeships 11are or become vacant. When a vacancy occurs in an at-large 12judgeship of the 6th judicial circuit, the at-large judgeship 13shall be converted to a resident judgeship for either 14Champaign County or Macon County, depending on which of those 152 counties the incumbent at-large circuit judge resided in 16when the incumbent judge was elected. The first 3 that become 17vacant after January 7, 2022 (the effective date of Public Act 18102-693) shall be converted to resident judgeships elected 19from Champaign County. The remaining two at-large judgeships 20that become vacant shall be converted to resident judgeships 21elected from Macon County. Thereafter, persons elected to 22those resident judgeships shall be residents of the county 23which elects them.  SB0180- 2 -LRB104 08658 JRC 18712 b1    (b) It is the intent of the General Assembly not to create 2any additional judgeships in the 6th judicial circuit by 3Public Act 102-693 and this amendatory Act of the 102nd 4General Assembly. Notwithstanding any other provision of law 5to the contrary, the conversion of at-large judgeships to 6resident judgeships under subsection (a) of this Section shall 7not entitle the 6th judicial circuit to any additional circuit 8judgeships elected at-large.9(Source: P.A. 102-693, eff. 1-7-22; 102-1126, eff. 2-10-23.) 10    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 11becoming law.